Illinois, session 104th, HB5607.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Advanced Technology Leadership Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds that:7        (1) Advanced technology companies have made 8    contributions in furthering the efficacy of the State and 9    nation's economy, including setting new standards in clean 10    energy development.11        (2) The General Assembly formalizes those 12    contributions to the energy sector in this Act.13        (3) This Act will allow covered data centers with 14    information technology loads greater than or equal to 5 15    megawatts to construct, generate, or procure clean energy 16    resources equivalent to a percentage of the data center's 17    annual electricity usage. 18    Section 10. Definitions. As used in this Act:19    "Agency" means the Illinois Power Agency.20    "Applicable grid region" means an independent system 21operator's or regional transmission organization's subregion 22from which a covered data center may procure energy and   HB5607- 2 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1eligible energy attribute certificates pursuant to Sections 12 2and 15 of this Act.3        (1) For covered data centers physically located in 4    region of the PJM Interconnection, LLC, "applicable grid 5    region" means the PJM control zones currently known as 6    ComEd (COMED); American Electric Power Co., Inc (AEP); 7    Dayton Power and Light Company (DAY); Ohio Valley Electric 8    Corporation (OVEC); Duke Energy Ohio/Kentucky (DUKE); 9    Eastern Kentucky Power Cooperative (EKPC); American 10    Transmission Systems, Inc. (ATSI); Allegheny Power Company 11    (APS); and Duquesne Light (DUO). Electric cooperatives and 12    municipal utilities that are physically interconnected to 13    the PJM Interconnection, LLC and located within the 14    borders of these control zones will be deemed to be 15    located within the applicable grid region.16        (2) For covered data centers physically located in the 17    Midcontinent Independent System Operator (MISO) region, 18    "applicable grid region" means MISO's Local Resource Zones 19    1, 2, 3, 4, 5, and 6. Electric cooperatives and municipal 20    utilities that are physically interconnected to MISO and 21    located within the borders of these local resource zones 22    shall be deemed to be located within the applicable grid 23    region.24    "Battery discharge credits" or "BDCs" means energy 25attribute certificates representing the discharge of stored 26energy generation.  HB5607- 3 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1    "Commercial operation date" means, when used in reference 2to electric generating facilities, battery facilities, or 3geothermal heating and cooling systems, the date when 4commissioning tests have been completed, to the extent 5applicable, and the facility has been energized and starts to 6generate power or discharge power or leverage geothermal 7energy.8    "Commission" means the Illinois Commerce Commission.9    "Covered data center" means an Illinois-sited facility 10primarily used to house networked computer servers that:11        (1) has an aggregated information technology load 12    greater than or equal to 5 megawatts measured as the 13    average demand over any rolling 12-month period and;14        (2) a load factor of at least 50%.15    "Double counting" means a situation in which 2 separate 16entities use the same energy attribute certificate to make 17separate energy generation, consumption, or attribute claims.18    "Double claiming" means a situation in which one entity 19makes an energy generation, consumption, or attribute claim 20substantiated by an energy attribute certificate retirement 21and another entity makes an energy generation, consumption, or 22attribute claim advertently or inadvertently based on the same 23megawatt-hour but substantiated by non-EAC data, such as 24generation data or sales data.25    "EAC" means energy attribute certificate.26    "Eligible energy" means electricity generated by wind,   HB5607- 4 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1solar, hydropower, geothermal, and nuclear resources, as well 2as exclusively biogenic waste-to-energy electricity or clean 3hydrogen electricity generated by facilities that do not use 4fossil fuels. "Eligible energy" includes the discharge of 5eligible energy by battery resources, as well as geothermal 6energy leveraged by geothermal heating and cooling systems.7    "Eligible energy attribute certificate" or "eligible EAC" 8means a serialized accounting instrument, expressed in 9megawatt-hour units, representing eligible energy that is 10registered, exchanged, and retired on an Agency-approved 11tracking system and meets all of the requirements of this Act. 12"Eligible energy attribute certificate" or "eligible EAC" 13includes RECs, GRECs, NECs, BDCs, AECs, and zero-emission 14credits that represent eligible energy.15    "Geothermal heating and cooling system" means a system 16that meets all of the following requirements:17        (1) the system exchanges thermal energy from 18    groundwater or a shallow ground source to generate or 19    leverage thermal energy through an electric geothermal 20    heat pump or a system of electric geothermal heat pumps 21    interconnected with any geothermal extraction facility 22    that is:23            (A) a closed loop or a series of closed loop 24        systems in which fluid is permanently confined within 25        a pipe or tubing and does not come in contact with the 26        outside environment; or  HB5607- 5 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1            (B) an open loop system in which ground or surface 2        water is circulated in an environmentally safe manner 3        directly into the facility and returned to the same 4        aquifer or surface water source;5        (2) the system meets or exceeds federal Energy Star 6    product specification standards for geothermal heat pumps 7    established on January 1, 2012, as clarified by the 8    Environmental Protection Agency guidance document released 9    on February 28, 2012 entitled Clarification to the 10    Geothermal Heat Pump Verification Testing Requirements and 11    Basic Model Group Definition or any successor standards 12    that meet or exceed these standards;13        (3) the system replaces or displaces less efficient 14    space or water heating systems, regardless of fuel type;15        (4) the system replaces or displaces less efficient 16    space cooling systems, when applicable; and17        (5) the system does not feed electricity back to the 18    grid, as defined at the level of the geothermal heat pump.19    "Geothermal renewable energy credit" or "GREC" means an 20energy attribute certificate derived from geothermal heating 21and cooling systems expressed in megawatt-hour units.22    "M-RETS" means the energy attribute certificate tracking 23system, or successor platform, approved by the Agency for the 24tracking, retirement, and auditing of EACs produced by 25facilities in the MISO region.26    "Nuclear energy credits" or "NEC" means an energy   HB5607- 6 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1attribute certificate derived from nuclear energy resources, 2including both fission and fusion processes, that are 3physically located in the State of Illinois. "Nuclear energy 4credits" or "NEC" includes zero-emission credits on PJM-GATS 5or alternative energy credits on M-RETS, including 6CleanCounts. "Nuclear energy credits" or "NEC" does not 7include an energy attribute certificate derived from nuclear 8energy resources outside of the State of Illinois.9    "PJM-GATS" means the PJM Environmental Information 10Services Generation Attribute Tracking System for energy 11attribute certificates, or successor platform approved by the 12Agency for tracking, retirement, and auditing of EACs produced 13in the PJM Interconnection LLC region.14    "Renewable energy credit" or "REC" means an energy 15attribute certificate subject to this Act that is derived from 16wind, solar, hydropower, geothermal, and exclusively biogenic 17waste-to-energy electricity or clean hydrogen electricity 18generated by facilities that do not use fossil fuels.19    "Repowered project" means a project featuring the removal, 20replacement, or expansion of individual turbines or generators 21at an existing project site that is completed after the 22effective date of this Act. 23    Section 14. Credits; qualification under the Act.24    (a) BDCs shall be derived from metered battery discharge 25data and shall be expressed in megawatt-hour units. In order   HB5607- 7 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1for BDCs to be considered an eligible EAC and thus qualify for 2use by covered data centers under this Act, BDCs must be 3temporally matched with generation-based eligible EACs that 4represent the battery's discharged eligible energy as produced 5by eligible generation facilities located within the battery's 6own applicable grid region. Both the BDC and the BDC's 7temporally matched must meet all of the requirements in this 8Act.9    (b) Repowered projects shall have a commercial operations 10date concomitant with completion of the repowering project, 11when the repowered facility or repowered individual units have 12been reenergized and begin once again to generate power or 13discharge power or leverage geothermal energy. Only energy 14attribute certificates produced by individual repowered 15generator units that meet all of the requirements of this Act 16shall be eligible for compliance with this Act.17    (c) Other than geothermal renewable energy credits 18produced by geothermal heating and cooling systems and battery 19discharge credits that qualify under this Act, all eligible 20EACs that qualify for compliance with this Act must represent 21electricity generation.22    (d) GREC calculation shall correspond with the 23Agency-approved methodology in use for the Geothermal Homes & 24Businesses Act.25    (e) NECs must exclusively represent electricity generation 26in megawatt-hour units and the State-sited generating facility   HB5607- 8 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1must meet all of the requirements of this Act. 2    Section 15. Procurement and accounting framework; 3resources, deliverability, and temporality.4    (a) Beginning calendar year 2027, each covered data center 5shall self-generate or procure and then retire eligible EACs 6equal to the following percentages of the covered data 7center's annual State electricity consumption: 8        (1) for 2027, 70%;9        (2) for 2028, 80%;10        (3) for 2029, 90%; and11        (4) for 2030 and thereafter, 100%.12    In the 2027 compliance year, at least 40% of that year's 13requirement shall be met with retirements of eligible EACs 14produced by eligible energy facilities physically located in 15this State. At least 2% of that year's requirement shall be met 16with retirements of eligible battery discharge credits 17produced by batteries physically located in this State. 5% of 18that year's requirement shall be met with retirements of 19eligible EACs produced by geothermal heating and cooling 20systems physically located in the applicable grid region.21    In the 2028 compliance year, at least 45% of that year's 22requirement shall be met with retirements of eligible EACs 23produced by eligible energy facilities physically located in 24this State. At least 5% of that year's requirement shall be met 25with retirements of eligible battery discharge credits   HB5607- 9 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1produced by batteries physically located in this State. 7% of 2that year's requirement shall be met with retirements of 3eligible EACs produced by geothermal heating and cooling 4systems physically located in the applicable grid region.5    In the 2029 compliance year, at least 50% of that year's 6requirement shall be met with retirements of eligible EACs 7produced by eligible energy facilities physically located in 8this State. At least 7% of that year's requirement shall be met 9with retirements of eligible battery discharge credits 10produced by batteries physically located in this State. 10% of 11that year's requirement shall be met with retirements of 12eligible EACs produced by geothermal heating and cooling 13systems physically located in the applicable grid region.14    In the 2030 compliance year and all years thereafter, at 15least 60% of the annual requirement shall be met with 16retirements of eligible EACs produced by eligible energy 17facilities physically located in this State. At least 10% of 18that year's requirement shall be met with retirements of 19eligible battery discharge credits produced by batteries 20physically located in this State. 15% of that year's 21requirement shall be met with retirements of eligible EACs 22produced by geothermal heating and cooling systems physically 23located in the applicable grid region. 24    (b) In addition to the requirements of subsection (a), a 25covered data center's compliance requirement shall be 26otherwise met by retirements of eligible EACs produced by   HB5607- 10 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1eligible energy facilities that are physically interconnected 2and located in the applicable grid region. 3    (c) For compliance years up to and through 2029, all 4eligible energy represented by eligible EACs that were retired 5in order to comply with this Act must have been generated, 6discharged, or leveraged within the same year, or one year 7prior, as the year for which the data center is making a 8compliance claim.9    (d) For compliance years 2030 and after, covered data 10centers shall account for electricity consumption on an hourly 11basis and match each hour's total electricity usage with 12eligible EACs that represent eligible energy generated, 13discharged, or leveraged during that same hour. 14    (e) A covered data center shall retire eligible EACs that 15are matched on an hourly basis to the following percentages of 16the covered data center's total State electricity consumption 17for the following compliance years: 18        (1) for 2030, 20% hourly matching;19        (2) for 2031, 30% hourly matching;20        (3) for 2032, 40% hourly matching;21        (4) for 2033, 60% hourly matching;22        (5) for 2034, 80% hourly matching; and23        (6) for 2035 and thereafter, 100% hourly matching.24    Hourly data shall be substantiated using either:25        (1) hourly EAC retirements on an approved EAC tracking 26    registry to the extent practicable, or  HB5607- 11 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1        (2) a document submitted to the Agency, such as a 2    spreadsheet, containing metered generation data for 3    eligible energy that fully corresponds to the covered data 4    center's EAC retirements, accounted for on an hourly basis 5    at minimum. Hourly generation data shall, at minimum, 6    include timestamps, the type of energy generated, and the 7    name of the facility for each hour of generation.8    (e) Eligible EACs retired in order to comply with this Act 9must have been produced by electric generation facilities and 10batteries that have a commercial operations date that is no 11more than 7 years older than the compliance year for which the 12EACs are retired. For geothermal heating and cooling systems, 13geothermal renewable energy credits retired for compliance 14with this Act must have been produced by systems that became 15operational no more than 5 years prior to the effective date of 16this Act. 17    (f) In order to meet the requirements of this Act, in no 18year may any covered data center use nuclear energy credits to 19account for more than 33% of any hour of the covered data 20center's State electricity consumption. In no year may any 21covered data center use renewable energy credits from 22repowered wind projects to account for more than 10% of any 23hour of the covered data center's State electricity 24consumption.25    (g) A covered data center may claim delivery of power from 26an eligible energy generation facility located in the   HB5607- 12 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1applicable grid region in which the covered data center is not 2located if hourly nodal or zonal locational marginal 3electricity prices are published at the points of both 4generation and consumption and the covered data center 5demonstrates that the average price at the point of 6consumption is less than 0.99 times the average price at the 7point of generation in the hour for which a claim is made. For 8a covered data center located in MISO, the covered data center 9may claim power from the applicable grid region for PJM if 10hourly nodal or zonal locational marginal electricity prices 11meet the criteria outlined in this subsection (g). For a 12covered data center located in PJM, the data center may claim 13power from the applicable grid region for MISO if hourly nodal 14or zonal locational marginal electricity prices meet the 15criteria in this subsection (g). 16    Section 20. Tracking and verification. 17    (a) Covered data centers shall account for and comply with 18this Act exclusively through the retirement of eligible EACs. 19    (b) The Agency shall initially approve the use of PJM-GATS 20for issuance, transfer, banking, and retirement of eligible 21EACs for covered data centers. The Agency shall also approve 22the use of M-RETS, including CleanCounts, for issuance, 23transfer, banking, and retirement of eligible EACs for covered 24data centers. The Agency shall have the authority to approve 25the use of alternative EAC tracking systems for future   HB5607- 13 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1compliance years. 2    (c) The Agency may develop verification requirements, 3consumer protection rules, and enforcement measures to ensure 4that all covered data centers responsibly comply with this 5Act. Verification shall at minimum, include the covered data 6center's annual submission of: 7        (1) prior-year State electricity consumption in 8    megawatt-hours; 9        (2) an itemized spreadsheet of eligible EAC 10    retirements for each year of compliance with this Act; and 11        (3) any deficiency payments made. 12    (d) Notwithstanding the EAC eligibility criteria laid out 13in this Act, EACs will not be eligible for compliance with this 14Act if the retirement of those EACs would result in the double 15counting or double claiming of otherwise eligible energy. 16        (1) Eligible EACs retired by covered data centers for 17    compliance with this Act are only valid for compliance 18    with this Act if those EACs have not been previously 19    retired by another entity that is not the covered data 20    center on any tracking system, carbon registry, or other 21    accounting mechanism at any time for any other purpose. 22        (2) An eligible EAC retired by a covered data center 23    for compliance with this Act is only valid for compliance 24    if that EAC, and its underlying electricity or geothermal 25    energy, has not been used to substantiate an energy 26    generation or energy usage claim by any other entity that   HB5607- 14 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1    is not the covered data center, of any type and at any 2    time, whether or not the EAC itself was actually retired 3    on a tracking system, registry, or other accounting 4    mechanism at the time of the claim. An ineligible EAC 5    includes an EAC for which the EAC itself, or the 6    attributes of the EAC's underlying energy such as 7    electricity comprising Standard Supply Service delivered 8    to customers, has been claimed by a utility in the form of 9    marketing, customer communications, regulatory reporting, 10    or environmental reporting, or has been otherwise claimed 11    by an obligated entity in a regulatory program such as, 12    but not limited to, a renewable portfolio standard or 13    carbon-free standard. 14        (3) An eligible EAC is valid only if retired once, and 15    claimed once, by the covered data center and for which no 16    additional or alternative claims have been made concerning 17    the EAC's underlying electricity or geothermal energy. The 18    requirements of this paragraph (3) also apply to hourly 19    accounting as of compliance year 2030. 20    Section 25. Enforcement. 21    (a) The Agency shall, on an ongoing basis, identify 22facilities that meet the definition of covered data center. 23The Agency shall inform those facilities of the compliance 24obligations required by this Act in a timely fashion and offer 25those facilities relevant onboarding information to better   HB5607- 15 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1facilitate such compliance.2    (b) If, in any year, a covered data center is unable to 3meet the obligations of this Act, or if the cost to comply with 4this Act exceeds $200 per megawatt-hour, a covered data center 5shall be obligated to make a deficiency payment equal to $200 6for each megawatt-hour shortfall for the year of 7noncompliance. The amount of any deficiency payment shall 8increase by 1% annually after 2027.9    (c) Any deficiency payments made by a covered data center 10shall be deposited into a dedicated Environmental Justice 11Clean Energy and Affordability Fund, administered by the 12Agency, and dedicated to lowering consumer energy costs for 13low-income qualifying residences. 14    Section 30. Administration. 15    (a) The Agency shall strive to minimize administrative 16expenses in the implementation and regulation of activities 17related to this Act. The Agency may use any existing program 18administrator and any applicable subcontractors to develop, 19administer, implement, operate, and evaluate activities and 20reporting related to this Act. If deemed necessary, the Agency 21may charge an annual participation fee from covered data 22centers to cover any expenses related to the administration 23and regulation of activities related to this Act.24    (b) The Agency and its consultant or consultants shall 25monitor activity related to this Act. The Agency and its   HB5607- 16 -LRB104 18886 AAS 32331 b1consultant or consultants may share program activity with 2external stakeholders and conduct quarterly meetings to 3discuss activity and market conditions related to this Act.4    (c) To the extent that any complaints received implicate 5the jurisdiction of the Attorney General, the Commission, or 6local, State, or federal law enforcement, the Agency shall 7also refer complaints to those entities as appropriate. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 9becoming law.